Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.070

Duties of department—Analysis of health services.

The department shall evaluate and analyze readily available data and information to determine the outcome and effectiveness of health services, utilization of services, and payment methods. This section should not be construed as allowing the department access to proprietary information.

(1) The department shall make its evaluations available to the board for use in preparation of the state health report required by *RCW 43.20.050, and to consumers, purchasers, and providers of health care.

(2) The department shall use the information to:

(a) Develop guidelines which may be used by consumers, purchasers, and providers of health care to encourage necessary and cost-effective services; and

(b) Make recommendations to the governor on how state government and private purchasers may be prudent purchasers of cost-effective, adequate health services.

[ 1995 c 269 s 2202; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 109.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.20.050 was amended by 2011 c 27 s 1, eliminating the "state health report."

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.